New Jersey, session 221, A4775.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2005, c. 348 (C.58:10-23.11e2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    At least  60 days prior to its agreement to any administrative or judicially approved settlement entered into pursuant to P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11 et seq.), the Department of Environmental Protection shall publish in the New Jersey Register and on the New Jersey Department of Environmental Protection's website the name of the case, the names of the parties to the settlement, the location of the property on which the discharge occurred, [and] a summary of the terms of the settlement, including the amount of any monetary payments made or to be made and, if the settlement addresses natural resource damages, a website link to the applicable natural resource damage assessment report and natural resource damage restoration plans and projects.  The Department of Environmental Protection shall provide written notice of the settlement, which shall include the information listed above, to all other parties in the case and to any other potentially responsible parties of whom the department has notice at the time of the publication. (cf: P.L.2015, c.166, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.